California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 487, Sec. 5.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall only certify a long-term care insurance policy or a health care service plan contract that meets the Medi-Cal asset protection requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 487, Sec. 6.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.1.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall only certify a long-term care insurance policy that substantially meets the requirements of Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 10231) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, except the requirements of Sections 10232.1, 10232.2, 10232.8, 10232.9, and 10232.92 of the Insurance Code, and that provides all of the items specified in subdivision (b). The State Department of Health Care Services shall only certify a health care service plan contract that has been approved by the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code as providing substantially equivalent coverage to that required by Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 10231) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, and
 that provides all of the items specified in subdivision (b). Policies issued by organizations subject to the Insurance Code and regulated by the Department of Insurance shall also be approved by the Department of Insurance.

(b) Only policies and contracts that provide all of the following items shall be certified by the department:

(1) Individual assessment and case management by a coordinating entity designated and approved by the department.

(2) Levels and durations of benefits that meet minimum standards set by the department pursuant to Section 22009.

(3) Protection against loss of benefits due to inflation. An applicant shall be offered, at the time of purchase, the following options:

(A) One option that provides, at a minimum, protection against inflation that automatically increases benefit levels by 5 percent each year over the previous year, up to an age specified by the program.

(B) At least one lower-cost option that provides protection against inflation that automatically increases benefit levels by, at a minimum, either 3 percent each year over the previous year or a fixed amount each year equal to 5 percent of the original benefit levels.

(4) A periodic record issued to the insured including an explanation of insurance payments or benefits paid that count toward Medi-Cal asset protection under this division.

(5) Compliance with any other requirements imposed by regulations adopted by the State Department of Health Care Services or the State Department of Social Services and
 consistent with the purposes of this division.

(c) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services may also certify a new policy or certificate, or maintain certification of a previously issued policy or certificate when the policyholder or certificate holder elects to reduce benefit levels, with a per diem benefit of at least one hundred dollars ($100) per day for a nursing facility, residential care facility, and home care and community-based services, if the policy or certificate provides a lifetime maximum benefit of not less than seventy-three thousand dollars ($73,000). A policy or certificate certified pursuant to this subdivision shall provide protection against inflation that automatically increases benefit levels by, at a minimum, either 3 percent each year over the previous year or a fixed amount each year equal to 5 percent of the original benefit levels, or, for a policyholder or certificate holder who elects
 to reduce benefit levels and is 70 years of age or older, 1 percent each year over the previous year.

(2) An insurer may offer a policy or certificate with the benefits described in paragraph (1) only if the insurer also offers the applicant policy benefits that provide at least a lifetime maximum benefit that, at the time of purchase, is equivalent in dollars to at least 365 times 70 percent of the average daily private pay rate for a nursing facility and a nursing facility per diem benefit of no less than 70 percent of the average daily private pay rate for a nursing facility.

(3) Except for the lifetime maximum benefit, per diem benefit, and inflation protection levels permitted by paragraphs (1) and (2), policies and certificates authorized by this subdivision shall comply with the standards described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) A premium rate schedule increase shall not exceed a cumulative total of 40 percent over any three-year period, and the amount of the increase shall be spread equally over each of the three years. The insurer shall send a premium increase notification each of the three years and include options, if available to the policyholder, to reduce coverage and lower the premium that would maintain partnership certification. If the Department of Insurance approves a premium rate schedule increase on or after January 1, 2023, the premium increase notification shall include the options described in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, as applicable, and disclose that the policyholder or certificate holder may have additional options to lower the premium, including additional options to increase the elimination period or to reduce the daily benefit, benefit duration, and protection against inflation.
 Paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, do not require an insurer to create new benefit levels or amend its approved rate schedule. Each of the options set forth in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, shall maintain partnership certification as long as the policy or certificate maintains at least the minimum benefit levels permitted by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a policy or certificate shall also maintain partnership certification if the policy or certificate is converted to a nonforfeiture benefit or a contingent benefit upon lapse. Even if a policyholder or certificate holder is not subject to a premium increase, the election of one of the available options set forth in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, shall not result in a loss of partnership certification as long as the policy or certificate maintains at least the minimum benefit levels permitted by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(1) Reduce the daily
 benefit by 50 percent, rounded up or down to the closest daily benefit level on the insurer’s approved rate schedule.

(2) Reduce the daily benefit by 25 percent, rounded up or down to the closest daily benefit level on the insurer’s approved rate schedule.

(3) Reduce the benefit duration to the lowest duration on the insurer’s approved rate schedule, but not below 12 months.

(4) Reduce the benefit duration to the next highest duration on the insurer’s approved rate schedule, relative to the current duration, but not below 12 months.

(5) Increase the elimination period to 90 days for a policy or certificate with an elimination period of less than 90 days, if the insurer’s approved rate schedule includes a 90-day elimination period.

(6) Convert a policy or certificate to a minimum coverage policy or certificate as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), if the insurer offers such a policy for sale in California.

(7) Reduce the protection against inflation to a lower-cost option that automatically increases benefit levels by either 3 percent each year over the previous year or a fixed amount each year equal to 5 percent of the original benefit levels. If the policyholder or certificate holder is 70 years of age or older and experiences a 50-percent or greater increase in premium over the life of the policy or certificate, the insurer shall also offer protection against inflation that automatically increases benefit levels by 1 percent each year over the previous year. An offer made pursuant to this paragraph to reduce protection against inflation shall allow a policyholder or certificate holder, regardless
 of the issue date, issue age, or present age, to retain the accrued daily, weekly, monthly, and lifetime benefit amounts in effect at the time of the reduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 22.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.2.

(a) Each organization issuing policies certified by the State Department of Health Care Services under this division shall each year contribute to a fund to be used for common educational and marketing expenses for reaching the target population designated by the California Partnership for Long-Term Care Program. The amount of each participating issuer’s required annual contribution shall be determined by the department and shall not be less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 487, Sec. 9.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.3.

(a) The insurer or producer shall, at the time of application, provide all of the following to the applicant:

(1) A graph that illustrates the difference in premium rates and policy benefits payable in accordance with the inflation protection provisions described
 in Section 22005.1.

(2) An illustration of the differences in benefits between the policies described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 22005.1.

(3) A description of the available lower-cost options and the advantages and disadvantages of each option, including the differences between lower and higher minimum benefits, lower and higher inflation protection options, the types of services covered, and how these options compare to the anticipated costs of home, community-based, and institutional care.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall prepare the materials described in subdivision (a) on behalf of issuers as provided in Section 22005.2 and shall require that the materials be incorporated into
 producer training curriculum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 565, Sec. 4.   (SB 1248)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22006.

The State Department of Health Care Services, in determining eligibility for Medi-Cal, and the State Department of Social Services, in determining eligibility for in-home supportive services, shall exclude resources up to, or equal to, the amount of insurance payments or benefits paid by approved and certified long-term care insurance policies or health care service plan contracts which cover long-term care services to the extent that the benefits paid are for all of the following:

(a) In-home supportive services benefits specified in regulations adopted by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 22009, or those services that Medi-Cal approves or benefits that Medi-Cal provides as
 specified in regulations adopted by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Section 22009.

(b) Services delivered to insured individuals at home or in a community setting as part of an individual assessment and case management program provided by coordinating entities designated and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(c) Services the insured individual receives after meeting the disability criteria for eligibility for long-term care benefits established by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 487, Sec. 11.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22007.

The program shall be designed so that the estimated aggregate state expenditures for long-term care services for individuals participating in the program do not exceed the aggregate expenditures that would be made for these services under the Medi-Cal program in effect prior to the implementation of this program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 802, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22008.

Advice and counseling may be provided by the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy program within the California Department of Aging to individuals interested in purchasing long-term care insurance or health care service plan contracts that cover long-term care services approved and certified pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 802, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22008.5.

Individuals who participate in the program shall remain eligible for those in-home supportive services benefits and those Medi-Cal benefits for which they are eligible under the program for the life of the purchaser of the policy or contract, as long as the purchaser maintains his or her insurance policy or health care service plan contract in force, or otherwise qualifies for continued benefits in accordance with regulations promulgated by the departments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 802, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22009.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall adopt regulations to implement this division, including, but not limited to, regulations that establish:

(1) The population and age groups that are eligible to participate in the program.

(2) The minimum level of long-term care insurance or long-term care coverage included in health care service plan contracts that must be purchased to meet the requirement of subdivision (b) of Section 22003.

(3) (A) The amount and types of services that a long-term
 care insurance policy or health care service plan contract that includes long-term care services must cover to meet the requirements of this division. The types of policies or plans shall include nursing and residential care facility coverage only, home care, community-based services, and residential care facility coverage only, and comprehensive coverage.

(B) Policies that provide only home care benefits shall include coverage for electronic or other devices intended to assist in monitoring the health and safety of an insured.

(4) Which coordinating entities are designated and approved to deliver individual assessment and case management services to individuals at home or in a community setting, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 22006.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall also adopt regulations to implement this division, including, but not limited to, regulations that establish:

(1) The disability criteria for eligibility for long-term care benefits as required by subdivision (c) of Section 22006.

(2) The specific eligibility requirements for receipt of the Medi-Cal benefits provided for by the program, and those Medi-Cal benefits for which participants in the program shall be eligible.

(c) The State Department of Social Services shall also adopt regulations to implement this division, including, but not limited to, regulations that establish:

(1) The specific eligibility requirements for in-home supportive services benefits.

(2) Those in-home supportive services benefits for which participants in the program shall be eligible.

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Social Services shall also jointly adopt regulations that provide for the following:

(1) Continuation of benefits pursuant to Section 22008.5.

(2) The protection of a participant’s resources pursuant to Section 22004, and the ratio of resources to long-term care benefit payments as described in subdivision (c) of Section 22004.

(e) (1) The departments shall adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to implement this division. The adoption of regulations pursuant to this section in order to implement this division shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State. The regulations shall not remain in effect more than
 120 days unless the adopting agency complies with all of the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) as required by subdivision (c) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 565, Sec. 5.   (SB 1248)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22010.

(a) In implementing this division, the State Department of Health Care Services may contract, on a bid or nonbid basis, with any qualified individual, organization, or entity for services needed to implement the project, and may negotiate contracts, on a nonbid basis, with long-term care insurers, health care service plans, or both, for the provision of coverage for long-term care services that will meet the certification requirements set forth in Section 22005.1 and the other requirements of this division.

(b) In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature declares that an expedited process for issuing contracts pursuant to this division is necessary. Therefore, contracts
 entered into on a nonbid basis pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 487, Sec. 13.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. SURVIVORS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING SUPPORT ACT [23020. - 23026.]



CHAPTER 1. Law Enforcement Collaboration [23020. - 23026.]

23020.

By no later than December 1, 2026, each law enforcement agency shall establish and maintain a written policy regarding interactions with survivors of human trafficking based on the guidelines developed by the commission pursuant to Section 23024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 2020)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23022.

(a) A policy established pursuant to this chapter shall, without limitation, include all of the following:

(1) A requirement that an officer contacting a survivor of human trafficking inform them that they have the right to have an advocate present during any interviews with law enforcement and other subsequent examinations and proceedings.

(2) A requirement that the officer explain the benefits of being represented by an advocate, including, without limitation, confidentiality and evidentiary privilege, emotional support, assistance in accessing resources, and assistance with understanding their legal rights.

(3) A requirement that, if the survivor requests an advocate, the officer contact the rape crisis center or another appropriate organization, such as an immigrant services organization, and arrange for an advocate to be present for any further interviews or examinations.

(4) A requirement that an officer obtain a waiver in writing if a survivor refuses an advocate, and inform them that they may revoke their waiver at any time and request an advocate.

(5) A requirement that the officer provide referrals to organizations that provide services to survivors of human trafficking, including, but not limited to, immigrant services organizations.

(6) A requirement that a law enforcement agency, in collaboration with community-based organizations, establish a process for referrals of human trafficking victims to
 the county social services department.

(7) A requirement that a law enforcement agency work with community-based organizations to provide referrals to services that are consistent with a survivor’s culture, sexual orientation, and gender identity.

(b) Each law enforcement agency shall also create a standardized written waiver of advocacy or may use the waiver developed by the commission pursuant to Section 23024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 2020)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23024.

(a) By no later than June 1, 2026, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall develop and promulgate minimum guidelines for law enforcement personnel interactions with survivors of human trafficking. A law enforcement agency shall use these guidelines as a resource in creating the policy required under Section 23020 to establish procedures for law enforcement interactions with survivors of human trafficking.

(b) The guidelines shall, without limitation, meet the requirements of a policy described in Section 23022.

(c) (1) In developing the guidelines, the commission shall collaborate with appropriate groups and individuals having an
 interest and expertise in human trafficking. This shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following: 

(A) Community-based organizations providing services to survivors of human trafficking.

(B) Organizations with experience supporting survivors of labor trafficking, including, but not limited to, immigrant legal service providers.

(C) Human trafficking victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, and domestic violence victim service organizations, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, and rape crisis centers, as used in Section 13837 of the Penal Code.

(2) When collaborating with organizations pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission shall prioritize
 organizations that have been providing services for at least five years.

(d) The commission shall also develop and promulgate a standardized written waiver of advocacy, as described in Section 23022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 2020)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23026.

As used in this chapter, the following terms are defined as follows:

(a) “Commission” means the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(b) “Law enforcement agency” means any department or agency of the state or any political subdivision thereof that employs any peace officer, as described in Section 830 of the Penal Code, and that provides uniformed general law enforcement services to the public. “Law enforcement agency” includes, without limitation, any municipal police department, county sheriff’s department, the California Highway Patrol, and the University of California and California State University police departments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 2020)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 24. STATE-ONLY FAMILY PLANNING PROGRAM [24000. - 24027.]

24000.

There is established in the State Department of Health Care Services the State-Only Family Planning Program to provide comprehensive clinical family planning services to low-income men and women. This division shall be known and may be cited as the State-Only Family Planning Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 121.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24001.

(a) (1) For purposes of this division, “family planning” means the process of establishing objectives for the number and spacing of children, and selecting the means by which those objectives may be achieved. These means include a broad range of acceptable and effective methods and services to limit or enhance fertility, including contraceptive methods, natural family planning, abstinence methods and basic, limited fertility management. Family planning services include, but are not limited to, preconception counseling, maternal and fetal health counseling, general reproductive health care, including diagnosis and treatment of infections and conditions, including cancer, that threaten reproductive capability, medical family
 planning treatment and procedures, including supplies and followup, and informational, counseling, and educational services. Family planning shall not include abortion, pregnancy testing solely for the purposes of referral for abortion or services ancillary to abortions, not including contraceptives, or pregnancy care that is not incident to the diagnosis of pregnancy.

(2) Family planning services for males shall be expanded to include laboratory tests for sexually transmitted infections and comprehensive physical examinations. Within 60 days of approval of the Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) Waiver Program, provided for pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 14132, the department shall seek to amend the waiver to add this expansion. The implementation of this paragraph shall be dependent upon federal approval and receipt of federal financial participation.

(b) For purposes of this division, “department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 122.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24003.

(a) A person shall be eligible to receive services pursuant to this chapter provided that the following conditions are met:

(1) The person is a resident of California.

(2) The person has a family income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(3) The person has no other source of health care coverage unless the use of that health care coverage would create a barrier to access because of confidentiality.

(4) The person is not otherwise eligible for existing Medi-Cal services without a share of cost.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provision of family planning services shall not require the consent of anyone other than the person who is to receive the services.

(c) Eligibility shall be determined at point of service by the provider. The provider shall obtain information on the individual’s family size, income, and health care coverage and then, based on that information, determine if the individual meets the eligibility criteria specified in subdivision (a). All individuals who meet the eligibility requirements shall be certified by the provider as eligible for services under the program. A Medi-Cal share of cost shall not be used to deny access to family planning services under the program. The department may require the collection on a voluntary basis or the use of the individual’s social security number, or both. No services shall be denied to a client if a social security number is not provided.

(d) Eligibility shall be based on the individual’s self-declaration of gross annual or monthly income, family size, and other source of health care coverage, signed under penalty of perjury at each annual eligibility certification. No asset information shall be used to determine eligibility.

(e) The department may establish a copayment system for services provided pursuant to this chapter that is based upon the income level of the individual and the cost of the service provided. No individual whose documented family income is at or below 100 percent of the federal poverty level shall be subject to copayment. The copayment fee shall not be used to deny access to family planning services. State reimbursement to the provider shall be offset by that amount of the copayment collected from the eligible individual. The department shall notify providers on an annual basis of the copayment fee schedule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 52.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

24003.2.

The basic preventive health services covered under this program shall include measles, mumps, and rubella vaccines for women of reproductive age. Within 60 days of approval of the Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) Waiver Program, provided for pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 14132, the department shall seek to amend the waiver to add this expansion. The implementation of this section shall be dependent upon federal approval and receipt of federal financial participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 71.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24003.5.

Any male or female of reproductive age who is not at risk for pregnancy and is eligible for the program shall have available the scope of benefits provided by the program. Within 60 days of approval of the Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) Waiver Program, provided for pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 14132, the department shall seek to amend the waiver to add this expansion. The implementation of this section shall be dependent upon federal approval and receipt of federal financial participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 72.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24005.

(a) This section applies to the Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment Program identified in subdivision (aa) of Section 14132 and this program.

(b) Only licensed medical personnel with family planning skills, knowledge, and competency may provide the full range of family planning medical services covered in this program.

(c) Medi-Cal enrolled providers, as determined by the department, shall be eligible to provide family planning services under the program when these services are within their scope of practice and licensure. Those clinical providers electing to participate in the program and approved by the department shall provide
 the full scope of family planning education, counseling, and medical services specified for the program, either directly or by referral, consistent with standards of care issued by the department.

(d) The department shall require providers to enter into clinical agreements with the department to ensure compliance with standards and requirements to maintain the fiscal integrity of the program. Provider applicants, providers, and persons with an ownership or control interest, as defined in federal Medicaid regulations, shall be required to submit to the department their social security numbers to the full extent allowed under federal law. All state and federal statutes and regulations pertaining to the audit or examination of Medi-Cal providers apply to this program.

(e) Clinical
 provider agreements shall be signed by the provider under penalty of perjury. The department may screen applicants at the initial application and at any reapplication pursuant to requirements developed by the department to determine provider suitability for the program.

(f) The department may complete a background check on clinical provider applicants for the purpose of verifying the accuracy of information provided to the department for purposes of enrolling in the program and in order to prevent fraud and abuse. The background check may include, but not be limited to, unannounced onsite inspection prior to enrollment, review of business records, and data searches. If discrepancies are found to exist during the preenrollment period, the department may conduct additional inspections prior to enrollment. Failure to remediate significant discrepancies
 as prescribed by the director may result in denial of the application for enrollment. Providers that do not provide services consistent with the standards of care or that do not comply with the department’s rules related to the fiscal integrity of the program may be disenrolled as a provider from the program at the sole discretion of the department.

(g) The department shall not enroll any applicant who, within the previous 10 years:

(1) Has been convicted of any felony or misdemeanor that involves fraud or abuse in any government program, that relates to neglect or abuse of a patient in connection with the delivery of a health care item or service, or that is in connection with the interference with, or obstruction of, any investigation into health care related fraud or abuse.

(2) Has been found liable for fraud or abuse in any civil proceeding, or that has entered into a settlement in lieu of conviction for fraud or abuse in any government program.

(h) In addition, the department may deny enrollment to any applicant that, at the time of application, is under investigation by the department or any local, state, or federal government law enforcement agency for fraud or abuse. The department shall not deny enrollment to an otherwise qualified applicant whose felony or misdemeanor charges did not result in a conviction solely on the basis of the prior charges. If it is discovered that a provider is under investigation by the department or any local, state, or federal government law enforcement agency for fraud or abuse, that provider shall be subject to
 immediate disenrollment from the program.

(i) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the program shall disenroll as a program provider any individual who, or any entity that, has a license, certificate, or other approval to provide health care that is revoked or suspended by a federal, California, or other state’s licensing, certification, or other approval authority, has otherwise lost that license, certificate, or approval, or has surrendered that license, certificate, or approval while a disciplinary hearing on the license, certificate, or approval was pending. The disenrollment shall be effective on the date the license, certificate, or approval is revoked, lost, or surrendered.

(B) (i) The department
 may elect to not disenroll an individual or entity as a provider in the program pursuant to subparagraph (A) if the revocation, suspension, or loss of the individual’s or entity’s license, certification, or other approval in another state, or if the pending disciplinary hearing during which the individual or entity surrendered the license, certification, or other approval in another state, is based solely on conduct that is not deemed to be unprofessional conduct under California law.

(ii) The department shall seek any federal approvals that it deems necessary to implement this subparagraph. This subparagraph shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals and that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a provider shall be subject to disenrollment if the provider submits claims for payment for the services, goods, supplies, or merchandise provided, directly or indirectly, to a program beneficiary, by an individual or entity that has been previously suspended, excluded, or otherwise made ineligible to receive, directly or indirectly, reimbursement from the program or from the Medi-Cal program and the individual has previously been listed on either the Suspended and Ineligible Provider List, which is published by the department, to identify suspended and otherwise ineligible providers or any list published by the federal Office of the Inspector General regarding the suspension or exclusion of individuals or entities from the federal Medicare and Medicaid programs, to identify
 suspended, excluded, or otherwise ineligible providers.

(B) (i) Subparagraph (A) does not apply if the sole basis for an individual’s listing on either the Suspended and Ineligible Provider List or any list published by the federal Office of the Inspector General regarding the suspension or exclusion of individuals or entities from the federal Medicare and Medicaid programs, to identify suspended, excluded, or otherwise ineligible providers, is conduct that is not deemed to be unprofessional conduct under California law.

(ii) The department shall request a waiver or any other federal approvals that it deems necessary to implement this subparagraph. This subparagraph shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals
 and that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(3) The department shall deactivate, immediately and without prior notice, the provider numbers used by a provider to obtain reimbursement from the program when warrants or documents mailed to a provider’s mailing address, its pay to address, or its service address, if any, are returned by the United States Postal Service as not deliverable or when a provider has not submitted a claim for reimbursement from the program for one year. Prior to taking this action, the department shall use due diligence in attempting to contact the provider at its last known telephone number and to ascertain if the return by the United States Postal Service is by mistake and shall use due diligence in attempting to contact the provider by
 telephone or in writing to ascertain whether the provider wishes to continue to participate in the Medi-Cal program. If deactivation pursuant to this section occurs, the provider shall meet the requirements for reapplication as specified in regulation.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Mailing address” means the address that the provider has identified to the department in its application for enrollment as the address at which it wishes to receive general program correspondence.

(B) “Pay to address” means the address that the provider has identified to the department in its application for enrollment as the address at which it wishes to receive warrants.

(C) “Service address” means the address that the provider has identified to the department in its application for enrollment as the address at which the provider will provide services to program beneficiaries.

(j) Subject to Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may enter into contracts to secure consultant services or information technology including, but not limited to, software, data, or analytical techniques or methodologies for the purpose of fraud or abuse detection and prevention. Contracts under this section shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code.

(k) Enrolled providers shall attend specific orientation approved by the department in comprehensive family planning
 services. Enrolled providers who insert IUDs or contraceptive implants shall have received prior clinical training specific to these procedures.

(l) Upon receipt of reliable evidence that would be admissible under the administrative adjudication provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, of fraud or willful misrepresentation by a provider under the program or commencement of a suspension under Section 14123, the department may do any of the following:

(1) Collect any State-Only Family Planning